Utah statutes.
4-24-30.   Commission to appoint supervisor for brand inspection --
Appointment subject to approval -- Salary.
The commissioner shall appoint a state supervisor for livestock brand
inspection, but such appointment is subject to the approval of the Livestock
Brand Board.  The salary or compensation of the supervisor shall be fixed in
accordance with standards adopted by the Division of Finance.
